Alaska, session 34, HB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.19 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 44.19.032. Governor's mansion. The Office of the Governor shall rent 06 the governor's mansion on a short-term basis when the legislature is not in session and 07 the governor has not reserved the mansion in advance. If the legislature is called into 08 special session, an agreement to rent the mansion during the special session is 09 unenforceable. The Office of the Governor shall adopt regulations establishing a 10 system for making the governor's mansion available for a person to rent and the fee 11 charged for renting the mansion. 12 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.